Ohio, session 136, SB402.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5.63 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5.63. The sixth day of March is designated as "General Philip Sheridan Day" in recognition of Philip Sheridan, the civil war cavalry general who was born on that day in 1831.